Utah statutes.
10-3-825.   Additional bonds.

The governing body of any municipality may at any time require further and additional bonds of any or all officers elected or appointed. All bonds given by the officers of any municipality, except as otherwise provided by law, shall be filed with the recorder, except that the bond of the recorder shall be filed with the treasurer.

